Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.219

Arrest for prostitution or prostitution loitering—Alleged offender—Victim of severe form of trafficking, commercial sex abuse of a minor.

In any proceeding under this chapter related to an arrest for prostitution or prostitution loitering, there is a presumption that the alleged offender meets the criteria for a certification as a victim of a severe form of trafficking in persons as defined in section 7105 of Title 22 of the United States code, and that the alleged offender is also a victim of commercial sex abuse of a minor.

[ 2010 c 289 s 9.]